Arkansas statutes. Title 13 Libraries, Archives, and Cultural Resources
Chapter 4

Public Records Management and Archives

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Identical Acts 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), Nos. 2 and 3, § 1, provided:

“(a)

The General Assembly finds:

“(1)

State government provides vital functions that impact the lives of Arkansas citizens on a daily basis;

“(2)

While these functions are important, it is equally important to ensure that state government operates efficiently and effectively to eliminate unnecessary spending of tax dollars and provide timely and quality services to Arkansas citizens; and

“(3)

Issues such as the administrative organization of a governmental entity, the appointment structure of a governmental entity's governing board, and extraneous duties assigned to governmental entities hamper the operation of state government and result in unnecessary expenses and delays in the provision of state services.

“(b)

It is the intent of this act to amend provisions of law applicable to certain agencies, task forces, committees, and commission to promote efficiency and effectiveness in the operations of state government as a whole.”

Publisher's Notes.

Former Chapter 4, concerning public records management and archives, was repealed by Acts 1995, No. 905, § 11. The former chapter was derived from the following sources:

13-4-101. Acts 1973, No. 24, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 16-701.

13-4-102. Acts 1973, No. 24, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 16-702; Acts 1987, No. 500, § 1.

13-4-103. Acts 1973, No. 24, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 16-703.

13-4-104. Acts 1973, No. 24, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 16-704; Acts 1987, No. 500, §§ 2, 3.

13-4-105. Acts 1973, No. 24, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 16-705; Acts 1987, No. 500, §§ 4-7.

Former §§13-4-106 —13-4-108, concerning state and local government records committees, were previously repealed by Acts 1987, No. 500, § 8. They were derived from the following sources:

13-4-106. Acts 1973, No. 24, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 16-706.

13-4-107. Acts 1973, No. 24, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 16-707.

13-4-108. Acts 1973, No. 24, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 16-708.

13-4-109. Acts 1973, No. 24, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 16-709.

13-4-110. Acts 1973, No. 24, § 10; A.S.A. 1947, § 16-710.

Cross References.

Arkansas History Commission, §13-3-101 et seq.

Public records generally, §14-2-101 et seq.

Subchapter 1

— General Provisions

13-4-101 — 13-4-112. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This subchapter, regarding public records management and archives, was repealed by Acts 2001, No. 1252, § 1. The subchapter was derived from the following sources:

13-4-101. Acts 1995, No. 905, § 1.

13-4-102. Acts 1995, No. 905, § 2.

13-4-103. Acts 1995, No. 905, § 3.

13-4-104. Acts 1995, No. 905, § 4.

13-4-105. Acts 1995, No. 905, § 5; 1997, No. 250, § 76.

13-4-106. Acts 1995, No. 905, § 6.

13-4-107. Acts 1995, No. 905, § 6.

13-4-108. Acts 1995, No. 905, § 6.

13-4-109. Acts 1995, No. 905, § 7.

13-4-110. Acts 1995, No. 905, § 7.

13-4-111. Acts 1995, No. 905, § 8.

13-4-112. Acts 1995, No. 905, § 9.

Subchapter 2

— Electronic Court Records

Effective Dates.

Identical Acts 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), Nos. 2 and 3, § 128: July 1, 2016.

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

13-4-201. Electronic reproduction of court records.

Court clerks and any other public officers whose duty it is to make and maintain court records are authorized to use and employ an approved system of photographic recording, photostatic recording, microfilm, microcard, miniature photographic recording, digital compact disc, optical disc, and any other process that accurately reproduces or forms a durable medium for reproducing the original.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 1061, § 1; 1997, No. 882, § 1; 2003, No. 1185, § 20.

Amendments.

The 2003 amendment substituted “Court clerks” for “The circuit clerks, county clerks, municipal clerks and recorders.”

13-4-202. Requirements for format and storage of records.

When equipment necessary for such methods of recording is used to record court records, it shall meet all of the following requirements:

(1)

The information retained shall be in a usable and accessible format capable of accurately reproducing the original over the time periods specified in §13-4-301 et seq.;

(2)

Operational procedures shall ensure that the authenticity, confidentiality, accuracy, reliability, and appropriate level of security are provided to safeguard the integrity of the information;

(3)

Procedures shall be available for the backup, recovery, and storage of records to protect those records against media destruction or deterioration and information loss; and

(4)

A retention conversion-review schedule shall be established to ensure that electronically or optically stored information is reviewed for data conversion or recertification at least one (1) time every five (5) years or more frequently when necessary to prevent the physical loss of data or technological obsolescence of the medium.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 1061, § 1.

13-4-203. Records Retention Committee.

(a)

A Records Retention Committee shall be created, whose responsibility shall be to study, develop, and issue standards consistent with the guidelines enumerated in §13-4-202 which pertain to existing and future recording systems.

(b)

The committee shall include one (1) representative from each of the following:

(1)

The Arkansas Association of County Clerks;

(2)

The Arkansas Circuit Clerks Association;

(3)

The Association of Arkansas Counties;

(4)

The Arkansas State Archives;

(5)

The Division of Information Systems;

(6)

ARMA International; and

(7)

The Arkansas City Clerks, Recorders, and Treasurers Association.

(c)

The committee shall be chaired by a representative from the Administrative Office of the Courts.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 1061, § 2; 1997, No. 544, § 1; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 2, § 113; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 3, § 113; 2019, No. 910, § 6066.

Amendments.

The 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.) amendment by identical acts Nos. 2 and 3 substituted “State Archives” for “History Commission” in (b)(4).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Information Systems” for “Department of Information Systems” in (b)(5).

13-4-204. Destruction of original.

(a)

When any document is recorded by the means prescribed by §13-4-201, the paper original may be destroyed unless the document is over fifty (50) years old and handwritten or has been determined to be of historical value by the Arkansas State Archives.

(b)

If the paper original does not meet these criteria, the electronically stored document shall be considered the “original” document and shall be treated as such when proffered with the recorder's certification.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 1061, § 2; 1997, No. 882, § 2; 2001, No. 311, § 1; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 2, § 114; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 3, § 114.

Amendments.

The 2001 amendment substituted “paper original may be” for “original may be,” and substituted “has been determined … recorder's certification” for “its preservation is otherwise required by law.”

The 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.) amendment by identical acts Nos. 2 and 3 substituted “State Archives” for “History Commission” in (a).

Subchapter 3

— County Records Retention

Publisher's Notes.

This subchapter was formerly codified as §13-10-101 et seq.

Effective Dates.

Identical Acts 1995, Nos. 925 and 939, § 3: January 1, 1996.

Identical Acts 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), Nos. 2 and 3, § 128: July 1, 2016.

13-4-301. Retention required — Destruction — Electronic reproduction.

(a)(1)

A county shall maintain the records named in this subchapter for the period of time provided for in this subchapter, after which time the records may be destroyed.

(2)(A)

The records named in this subchapter shall not be destroyed until at least one (1) year after an audit by Arkansas Legislative Audit or a private audit is completed and approved.

(B)

A record named in this subchapter that is over fifty (50) years old shall not be destroyed before written notice by the custodian of the records and describing the scope and nature of the records in question has been furnished to the Arkansas State Archives, at least sixty (60) days before the destruction of the records.

(b)(1)

If a record is photographically or electronically transferred to other media of a permanent nature, the original documents may be destroyed, except that no handwritten records over fifty (50) years old shall be destroyed.

(2)

A county record that is photographically or electronically transferred to other media of a permanent nature shall be transferred by a process that accurately reproduces or forms a durable medium for reproducing the original.

(c)

When county records are transferred to other media of a permanent nature, the resulting transfer shall meet the following requirements:

(1)

The information in the county record retained shall be transferred into a usable and accessible format capable of accurately reproducing the original over the time periods specified in this section and §§13-4-302 —13-4-308;

(2)

Operational procedures shall ensure that the authenticity, confidentiality, accuracy, reliability, and appropriate level of security are provided to safeguard the integrity of the information in the county record;

(3)

Procedures shall be available for the backup, recovery, and storage of records to protect the records against media destruction or deterioration and information loss; and

(4)

A retention conversion-and-review schedule shall be established by each county official to ensure that electronically or optically stored information, for records required to be kept permanently, is reviewed for data conversion at least one (1) time every four (4) years or more frequently when necessary to prevent the physical loss of data or loss due to technological obsolescence of the medium.

(d)

Before a record is destroyed, the custodian of the record shall document the date and type of document.

(e)

Records not addressed explicitly under this subchapter may be destroyed no sooner than three (3) years after an audit by Arkansas Legislative Audit or any private auditor is completed and approved.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 800, § 8; 1997, No. 882, § 3; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 2, § 115; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 3, § 115; 2017, No. 560, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.) amendment by identical acts Nos. 2 and 3 substituted “State Archives” for “History Commission” in (a)(2)(B).

The 2017 amendment added “Electronic reproduction” to the section heading; substituted “A county” for “All counties of the State of Arkansas” in (a)(1); in (a)(2)(A), substituted “The records named in this subchapter shall not” for “But in no case shall the records”, and substituted “a private audit” for “any private auditor”; rewrote (a)(2)(B); redesignated former (b) as (b)(1); inserted “or electronically” in (b)(1); added (b)(2) and (c); redesignated former (c) as (d); substituted “a record is” for “any record shall be” in (d); and added (e).

13-4-302. Court records.

If a county of the State of Arkansas maintains records for the county courts, the county shall maintain these records as follows:

(1)(A)

For circuit court, civil and criminal, domestic relations, and probate records:

(i)

The county shall permanently maintain:

(a)

Complete case files and written exhibits for all courts;

(b)

Case indices for all courts;

(c)

Case dockets for all courts;

(d)

Grand jury reports;

(e)

Grand juror lists;

(f)

Petit jury lists in criminal cases;

(g)

Original records, documents, and transcripts relating to the summoning of jurors and jury selection for a petit jury in a criminal case; and

(h)

All probate records required to be maintained under §28-1-108;

(ii)

The county shall maintain for ten (10) years, after audit by Arkansas Legislative Audit:

(a)

Records and reports of costs; and

(b)

Fees assessed and collected; and

(iii)

The county shall maintain for three (3) years, after audit by Arkansas Legislative Audit:

(a)

Canceled checks;

(b)

Bank statements;

(c)

Petit jury lists in civil cases and original records, documents, and transcripts relating to the summoning of jurors and jury selection for a petit jury in a civil case; and

(d)

Served and quashed warrants.

(B)

The county shall maintain records of the juvenile division of circuit court, in accordance with §9-27-309 and other provisions of Title 9 and the Arkansas Juvenile Code of 1989, §9-27-301 et seq.;

(2)

For county court records:

(A)

The county shall permanently maintain:

(i)

County court records;

(ii)

Cemetery permits;

(iii)

Statements of receipt and expenditures; and

(iv)

County improvement district reports; and

(B)

The county shall maintain for ten (10) years, after audit by Arkansas Legislative Audit:

(i)

County court files;

(ii)

County general claims dockets;

(iii)

County road claims dockets;

(iv)

Contracts for lease-purchase on rental payments;

(v)

County school board financial reports;

(vi)

Solid waste disposal revenue bonds; and

(vii)

Allocations of state funds for solid waste disposal; and

(3)

For quorum court records:

(A)

The county shall permanently maintain:

(i)

Ordinance, appropriation ordinance, and resolution registers;

(ii)

Records of proceedings;

(iii)

Codification of ordinances;

(iv)

Registers of county advisory and administrative boards;

(v)

Appointments to subordinate service districts; and

(vi)

Quorum court minutes; and

(B)

The county shall maintain for one (1) year the county treasurer's monthly financial report.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 800, § 1; 2007, No. 226, § 1; 2015, No. 83, § 1; 2017, No. 560, § 2.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

As enacted, this section began “On and after July 15, 1991.”

Amendments.

The 2015 amendment added (1)(C)(iv).

The 2017 amendment rewrote the section.

13-4-303. Tax and assessment records.

All counties of the State of Arkansas shall maintain county tax and assessment records as follows, if they are currently being maintained:

(1)

For tax and assessment records:

(A)

Permanently maintain:

(i)

Real estate, personal, and mineral tax book;

(ii)

Delinquent real estate;

(iii)

Personal property list;

(iv)

Lands forfeited to the state, and minerals;

(v)

Land book of state and federally owned lands;

(vi)

Clerk's deed of land sold for taxes;

(vii)

Journal of proceedings of the county equalization board;

(viii)

Final settlement of tax books; and

(ix)

Original charge for all taxing units and certification;

(B)

Maintain for seven (7) years:

(i)

Real estate and personal assessment record;

(ii)

Real estate and personal tax receipts recorded in tax books; and

(iii)

Redemption certificate;

(C)

Maintain for five (5) years, after rollback is complete, certification of tax adjustment for public utilities and regulated carriers (computation of utility tax);

(D)

Maintain for three (3) years:

(i)

Delinquent personal tax settlement;

(ii)

Land redemption report;

(iii)

State lands distribution; and

(iv)

Monthly tax distribution;

(E)

Maintain for one (1) year, after audit by Arkansas Legislative Audit:

(i)

Valuation of real and personal property of utilities; and

(ii)

Real and personal property tax correction forms;

(2)(A)

For county assessor's records, maintain for five (5) years:

(i)

Real estate appraisal card after reappraisal;

(ii)

Lists of names of taxpayers furnished to assessor by school boards;

(iii)

The personal, commercial, and industrial assessment forms; and

(iv)

Inactive homestead credit documents.

(B)

Prior to destruction of these forms, the documents shall be made available to the county collector;

(3)

For county collector's records:

(A)

Maintain permanently:

(i)

Certified delinquent real estate list with publication certificate;

(ii)

Certified delinquent list for real estate forfeited to the Commissioner of State Lands with publication certification;

(iii)

Personal property tax book;

(iv)

Certified delinquent personal property list; and

(v)

Delinquent ad valorem tax lists for oil and gas interests;

(B)

Maintain for ten (10) years, tax settlements;

(C)

Maintain for seven (7) years:

(i)

Real estate redemption certificates;

(ii)

Cash receipts and disbursement journal; and

(iii)

Collector's copy of tax receipts; and

(D)

Maintain for three (3) years:

(i)

Daily collection reports; and

(ii)

Distraint of goods and garnishment to pay delinquent personal taxes.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 800, § 2; 2015, No. 71, § 1.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

As enacted, this section began “On and after July 15, 1991.”

Amendments.

The 2015 amendment added (2)(A)(iv); and substituted “the documents shall” for “they will” in (2)(B).

13-4-304. Financial records.

All counties of the State of Arkansas shall maintain financial records for the county as follows, if they are currently being maintained:

(1)

Social Security and federal income tax records maintained per federal regulations;

(2)

State income tax records maintained per state law and rules;

(3)

Wage garnishments maintained until after a lien is satisfied;

(4)(A)

Maintain for seventy-five (75) years:

(i)

Payroll records and ledger; and

(ii)

Retirement records;

(B)

Maintain for ten (10) years:

(i)

Appropriation journal (record of disbursements); and

(ii)

Warrant register or check disbursement record;

(C)

Maintain for seven (7) years:

(i)

County general claims certificate or invoice;

(ii)

County road claims certificate or invoice; and

(iii)

County school claims certificate or invoice;

(D)

Maintain for five (5) years:

(i)

Unemployment insurance state contribution; and

(ii)

Workers' compensation insurance payment; and

(E)

Maintain for three (3) years:

(i)

Warrants or checks, or both, with documentation;

(ii)

Bank records for trust, agency, fee, and court accounts (bank statements and canceled checks); and

(iii)

Receipt books and disbursement journal;

(5)

For county treasurer's records:

(A)

Maintain permanently:

(i)

Treasurer's operating and clearing account ledgers;

(ii)

Treasurer's trust and agency account ledgers;

(iii)

Treasurer's city account ledgers;

(iv)

Treasurer's improvement district account ledgers; and

(v)

Treasurer's school district account ledgers;

(B)

Maintain for seven (7) years:

(i)

Land redemption receipts;

(ii)

Annual settlement with county court; and

(iii)

Record of school bond indebtedness and matured school district bonds; and

(C)

Maintain for three (3) years:

(i)

Receipt books;

(ii)

Bank statements and canceled checks;

(iii)

Canceled warrants;

(iv)

Treasurer's monthly reconciliation;

(v)

Treasurer's monthly report to quorum court;

(vi)

Delinquent land redemption distribution reports;

(vii)

Delinquent personal distribution reports;

(viii)

County officials' monthly reports;

(ix)

Municipal court monthly reports;

(x)

Treasurer's monthly report to prosecuting attorney;

(xi)

School district bank statements;

(xii)

Annual report to county school supervisor;

(xiii)

Register of school warrants;

(xiv)

Teachers and school employee contracts; and

(xv)

Surety bond of school district treasurer and superintendent.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 800, § 3; 2019, No. 315, § 980.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

As enacted, this section began “On and after July 15, 1991.”

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (2).

13-4-305. Recorder's records.

All counties of the State of Arkansas shall maintain county recorder's records for the county as follows, if they are currently being maintained:

(1)

Maintain permanently:

(A)

Deeds, mortgages, assignments, and all other conveyance records;

(B)

Forfeited land records;

(C)

Timber, mineral, oil and gas deeds and leases;

(D)

Surveys;

(E)

Subdivision plats;

(F)

Lien records;

(G)

Military discharge records; and

(H)

Indices to all records; and

(2)

Maintain for ten (10) years, notary public bonds and official appointment bonds.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 800, § 4.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

As enacted, this section began “On and after July 15, 1991.”

13-4-306. Voter registration and election records.

All counties shall maintain county voter registration and election records for the county as follows, if the records are currently being:

(1)

Maintained permanently:

(A)

Voter registration record files;

(B)

Maps of election precincts from the county board of election commissioners;

(C)

Certificates of election; and

(D)

Ordinance election results; and

(2)(A)

Maintained for ten (10) years, after canceled, a person's voter registration record and reason for cancellation of a person's voter registration.

(B)

Maintained for ten (10) years:

(i)

Minutes of the board of election commissioners; and

(ii)

Election files.

(C)

Maintained for five (5) years:

(i)

Petition, certificate, and notices for ordinance;

(ii)

Political practice pledges;

(iii)

Campaign contribution and expenditure sheets;

(iv)

Code of ethics statements; and

(v)

Financial disclosures.

(D)

Maintained for two (2) years:

(i)

Acknowledgement notices giving the disposition of a person's voter registration application;

(ii)

Precinct voter registration lists prepared for each election;

(iii)

Confirmation notices mailed by a county clerk to confirm a voter's change of residence or name;

(iv)

Confirmation return cards received in response to a confirmation notice;

(v)

Absentee ballot applications and lists, except where litigation follows or federal law governs; and

(vi)

Voter registration cards; and

(E)

Until an election is certified to the Secretary of State under §7-5-701, all unused ballots.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 800, § 5; 1995, No. 925, § 2; 1995, No. 939, § 2; 2017, No. 560, § 3.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

As enacted, this section began “On and after July 15, 1991.”

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment, in the introductory language, deleted “of the State of Arkansas” following “counties”, substituted “the records” for “they”, and deleted “maintained” from the end; added (2)(D)(vi) and (2)(E); and made stylistic changes.

13-4-307. Marriage records — License and bond records.

All counties of the State of Arkansas shall maintain county marriage records, licenses, and bonds records for the county as follows, if they are currently being maintained:

(1)

Maintain permanently:

(A)

Marriage record and index;

(B)

Clerical licenses and credentials;

(C)

Medical license for physicians, physical therapists, podiatrists, osteopaths, and chiropractors; and

(D)

Record of marks and brands;

(2)

Maintain for seven (7) years:

(A)

Surety bonds for county and township officials (until 1986);

(B)

County employees blanket bonds; and

(C)

Oaths and bonds of county officials, deputies, school supervisors, etc.; and

(3)

Maintain for one (1) year:

(A)

Notice of intention to wed;

(B)

Going-out-of-business sale license;

(C)

Bond for going-out-of-business sale license;

(D)

Transient merchant license;

(E)

Transient merchant license bond;

(F)

Garnishment bonds; and

(G)

Mercury refiners license.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 800, § 6.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

As enacted, this section began “On and after July 15, 1991.”

13-4-308. Corporation records.

All counties of the State of Arkansas shall maintain corporation records for the county, if they are currently being maintained, permanently as follows:

(1)

Articles of incorporation;

(2)

Certificate of business under assumed name;

(3)

Articles of amendment;

(4)

Registration of fictitious names of corporation;

(5)

Articles of merger or consolidation;

(6)

Change of registered office or agent;

(7)

Authorized share of stock;

(8)

Cancellation of shares; and

(9)

Certificate of dissolution of corporation.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 800, § 7.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

As enacted, this section began “On and after July 15, 1991.”

Subchapter 4

— Sheriff's Office Record Retention Schedule

Effective Dates.

Identical Acts 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), Nos. 2 and 3, § 128: July 1, 2016.

13-4-401. Retention required — Destruction — Electronic reproduction.

(a)(1)

A county sheriff's office shall maintain the records named in this subchapter for the period of time provided in this subchapter, after which time the records may be destroyed.

(2)(A)

Administrative records shall not be destroyed until at least one (1) year after an audit by Arkansas Legislative Audit or a private auditor is completed and approved.

(B)

A record over fifty (50) years old shall not be destroyed before written notice by the custodian of the records in question has been furnished to the Arkansas State Archives, describing the scope and nature of the records, at least sixty (60) days before the destruction of the records.

(b)(1)

If a record is photographically or electronically transferred to other media of a permanent nature, the original document may be destroyed, except that a handwritten record over fifty (50) years old shall not be destroyed.

(2)

A county record that is photographically transferred to other media of a permanent nature shall be transferred by a process that accurately reproduces or forms a durable medium for reproducing the original.

(c)

When county records are transferred to other media of a permanent nature, the resulting transfer shall meet the following requirements:

(1)

The information in the county record retained shall be transferred into a usable and accessible format capable of accurately reproducing the original over the time periods specified in §13-4-301 et seq.;

(2)

Operational procedures shall ensure that the authenticity, confidentiality, accuracy, reliability, and appropriate level of security are provided to safeguard the integrity of the information in the county record;

(3)

Procedures shall be available for the backup, recovery, and storage of records to protect the records against media destruction or deterioration and information loss; and

(4)

A retention conversion-and-review schedule shall be established to ensure that electronically or optically stored information is reviewed for data conversion at least one (1) time every four (4) years or more frequently when necessary to prevent the physical loss of data or loss due to technological obsolescence of the medium.

(d)

Before any record is destroyed, the custodian of the record shall document the date and type of document.

(e)

Records explicitly not addressed in this subchapter may be destroyed no sooner than three (3) years after an audit by Arkansas Legislative Audit or a private auditor is completed and approved.

History.

Acts 2011, No. 43, §
1; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 2, § 116; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 3, § 116; 2017, No. 560, § 4.

Amendments.

The 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.) amendment by identical acts Nos. 2 and 3 substituted “State Archives” for “History Commission” in (a)(2)(B).

The 2017 amendment added “Electronic reproduction” to the section heading; substituted “Administrative records shall not” for “In no case shall administrative records” in (a)(2)(A); in (a)(2)(B), substituted “A” for “Any” and “shall not” for “will not”; redesignated former (b) as (b)(1); inserted “electronically” in (b)(1); added (b)(2) and (c); redesignated former (c) as (d); and added (e).

13-4-402. Retention of records otherwise provided.

A record retained by a county sheriff's office for which a retention period is otherwise provided in the Arkansas Code of 1987 Annotated is not subject to this subchapter, including without limitation records described in:

(1)

Section 12-12-104; and

(2)

Section 16-10-211.

History.

Acts 2011, No. 43, §
1.

13-4-403. Criminal investigation documentation — Definition.

(a)

As used in this section, “criminal investigation documentation” includes without limitation:

(1)

Incident or offense reports;

(2)

Arrest warrant records;

(3)

Search warrant records; and

(4)

Investigative case files, including:

(A)

Photographs;

(B)

Lab reports; and

(C)

Audiovisual media.

(b)

Criminal investigation documentation shall be retained for the following periods of time:

(1)

If the documentation is associated with a Class Y or Class A felony, it shall be retained for at least thirty (30) years;

(2)

If the documentation is associated with a non-Class Y felony, it shall be retained for at least ten (10) years;

(3)

If the documentation is associated with a misdemeanor or violation, it shall be retained for at least five (5) years; and

(4)

If the documentation relates to a civil matter or other noncriminal matter, it shall be retained for at least three (3) years.

(c)

Criminal investigation documentation may be disposed of by the order of the county judge upon recommendation of the county sheriff after the period of time dictated by subsection (b) of this section.

History.

Acts 2011, No. 43, §
1; 2017, No. 560, § 5.

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment added “As used” at the beginning of (a); substituted “for at least thirty (30) years” for “indefinitely” in (b)(1); substituted “a non-Class Y” for “any other” in (b)(2); inserted “at least” in (b)(2) through (b)(4); and made a stylistic change.

13-4-404. Jail booking records — Definition.

(a)

As used in this section, “jail booking records” means records generated and kept during jail booking procedures and while a person is in custody and includes without limitation:

(1)

Fingerprint cards;

(2)

Booking photographs; and

(3)

Jail detention logs.

(b)

Jail booking records shall be kept for at least five (5) years, after which time they may be disposed of by order of the county judge upon recommendation of the county sheriff.

History.

Acts 2011, No. 43, §
1; 2017, No. 560, § 6.

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment added “As used” at the beginning of (a); and substituted “at least five (5) years” for “thirty (30) years” in (b).

13-4-405. Dispatch reports — Definition.

(a)

As used in this section, “dispatch reports” means records generated and kept regarding:

(1)

Incoming calls to the county sheriff's office involving reports or complaints from the general public;

(2)

Complaint cards; and

(3)

Radio traffic logs.

(b)

Dispatch reports shall be kept for a period of at least five (5) years, after which they may be disposed of by the order of the county judge upon recommendation of the county sheriff.

History.

Acts 2011, No. 43, §
1; 2017, No. 560, § 7.

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment added “As used” at the beginning of (a); and substituted “at least five (5) years” for “seven (7) years” in (b).

13-4-406. Orders of protection.

Orders of protection issued by a circuit court under §9-15-201 et seq. shall be retained for a period of ten (10) years, after which time they may be disposed of by the order of the county judge upon recommendation of the county sheriff.

History.

Acts 2011, No. 43, §
1.

13-4-407. General law enforcement documentation.

The following documents, records, and reports, computerized or on paper, shall be retained for a period of five (5) years, after which time they may be disposed of by the order of the county judge upon recommendation of the county sheriff:

(1)

Citations;

(2)

Summons;

(3)

Subpoenas;

(4)

Writs of execution;

(5)

Writs of garnishment;

(6)

Writs of possession;

(7)

Writs of replevin; and

(8)

Other writs in the possession of the county sheriff.

History.

Acts 2011, No. 43, §
1.

13-4-408. Items in the possession of a county sheriff's office pursuant to a criminal investigation or court case — Misdemeanors.

(a)

If an item is in the possession of a county sheriff's office pursuant to a misdemeanor criminal investigation or court case, it shall be retained for a period of thirty (30) days after:

(1)

The investigation for which it is being held has closed; or

(2)

If the investigation results in a criminal prosecution, the date of the final judgment if there is no appeal of the conviction to circuit court.

(b)

A noncontraband item shall be returned to its owner.

(c)

The county sheriff shall petition the district court for the disposal or destruction of contraband or an item that an owner has not claimed.

History.

Acts 2011, No. 43, §
1.

13-4-409. Items in the possession of a county sheriff's office pursuant to a criminal investigation or court case — Felonies.

(a)

If an item is in the possession of a county sheriff's office pursuant to a felony criminal investigation, it shall be retained until the applicable statute of limitation for the most serious possible crime to which it could be connected has lapsed.

(b)(1)

If an item is in the possession of a county sheriff's office pursuant to a felony court case, it shall be retained for a period of two (2) years after the date of the final judgment if there is no appeal of the conviction.

(2)(A)

If there is an appeal of the conviction to an appellate court, the item shall be retained for three (3) years after the final judgment is entered and after the conclusion of any post-conviction litigation.

(B)

Post-conviction litigation includes without limitation:

(i)

Proceedings under Rule 37 of the Arkansas Rules of Criminal Procedure;

(ii)

State habeas corpus proceedings under §16-112-101 et seq.; and

(iii)

Federal habeas corpus proceedings under 28 U.S.C. § 2254.

(c)(1)

An item relating to the investigation of any of the following crimes shall be retained for ninety-nine (99) years:

(A)

Capital murder, §5-10-101;

(B)

Murder in the first degree, §5-10-102;

(C)

Murder in the second degree, §5-10-103;

(D)

Rape, §5-14-103;

(E)

Sexual assault in the first degree, §5-14-124; and

(F)

Arson, §5-38-301.

(2)

A deoxyribonucleic acid (DNA) sample or test result shall be retained for fifty (50) years.

(d)

After the time periods prescribed in this section have lapsed and an item may be disposed of or destroyed, a noncontraband item shall be returned to its owner.

(e)

The county sheriff shall petition the circuit court for the disposal or destruction of contraband or an item for which an owner has not asserted a claim.

History.

Acts 2011, No. 43, §
1.

13-4-410. Items in the possession of a county sheriff's office not pursuant to a criminal investigation or court case.

(a)

Any item in the possession of a county sheriff's office that is not associated with a criminal investigation or court case, such as a misplaced or lost-and-found item, shall be retained for one (1) year or until the rightful owner reclaims the item.

(b)

At the end of the period of time prescribed by this section, the county sheriff may request that the county judge authorize the disposal of any such item through destruction, public sale, or transfer of ownership to the county sheriff's office if the item would serve a needed public benefit.

History.

Acts 2011, No. 43, §
1.

13-4-411. Applicability — Constables.

This subchapter also applies to constables.

History.

Acts 2011, No. 43, §
1.